Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. Department and Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, § 6.

§ 3.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Board”
means the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“Commissioner”
means the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

“Department”
means the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

2008, c. 860.

Transitional provisions.

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 3.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2008, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 3.2 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 3.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 3.1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 3.1 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 4, provides: “That this title revision of Title 3.1 as Title 3.2 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee, or other appointed body referred to in Title 3.2 and each such officer and member shall continue to serve for the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 3.1.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 5, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 3.2 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2008 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 6, provides: “That the repeal of Title 3.1, effective as of October 1, 2008, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Title 3.1 nor the enactment of Title 3.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2008, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2008, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 7, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2008, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 3.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2008, c. 860, cl. 10, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2008.”

The cases prior to 2008 cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of

Titles 3

and 3.1.

Research References.

Agricultural Law (Matthew Bender) Harl.

§ 3.2-101.
Department continued; appointment of Commissioner; agriculture education.

The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services is continued. The Department shall be under the management and control of a Commissioner appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, for a term coincident with that of the Governor. Any vacancy in the office of the Commissioner shall be filled by appointment by the Governor pursuant to the provisions of Article V, Section 10 of the Constitution of Virginia.

There shall be established, within the Department, to be administered by the Department of Agriculture Education at Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, a unit of specialists in agriculture education. The unit shall: (i) assist in developing and revising local agriculture curricula to integrate the Standards of Learning; (ii) provide professional development for agriculture instructional personnel to improve the quality of agriculture education; (iii) conduct site visits to the schools providing agriculture education; and (iv) seek the input of business and industry representatives regarding the content and direction of agriculture education programs in the public schools of the Commonwealth.

Any required reduction in the Department’s budget shall be reflected in a proportional reduction in the operation of the agriculture education unit. The reduction in the allocation for operation of the agriculture education unit shall not exceed the percentage reduction provided for in the appropriation act for the Department.

In the event that additional funds are not allocated for these positions, the Department shall not be required to absorb the costs of these positions.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-7; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-8; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 34; 1978, c. 219; 1985, c. 397; 2004, c. 180, § 3.1-14.2; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, §§ 6, 7.

§ 3.2-101.1.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the Board, the Commissioner, or the Department may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, §§ 6, 7.

§ 3.2-102.
General powers and duties of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall be vested with the powers and duties set out in §

2.2-601

, the powers and duties herein provided, and such other powers and duties as may be prescribed by law, including those prescribed in Title 59.1. He shall be the executive officer of the Board, and shall see that its orders are carried out. He shall see to the proper execution of laws relating to the Department. Unless the Governor expressly reserves such power to himself, the Commissioner shall promote, protect, and develop the agricultural interests of the Commonwealth. The Commissioner shall develop, implement, and maintain programs within the Department including those that promote the development and marketing of the Commonwealth’s agricultural products in domestic and international markets, including promotions, market development and research, marketing assistance, market information, and product grading and certification; promote the creation of new agribusiness including new crops, biotechnology and new uses of agricultural products, and the expansion of existing agribusiness within the Commonwealth; develop, promote, and maintain consumer protection programs that protect the safety and quality of the Commonwealth’s food supply through food and dairy inspection activities, industry and consumer education, and information on food safety; preserve the Commonwealth’s agricultural lands; ensure animal health and protect the Commonwealth’s livestock industries through disease control and surveillance, maintaining animal health diagnostic laboratories, and encouraging the humane treatment and care of animals; protect public health and the environment through regulation and proper handling of pesticides, agricultural stewardship, and protection of endangered plant and insect species; protect crop and plant health and productivity; ensure consumer protection and fair trade practices in commerce; develop plans and emergency response protocols to protect the agriculture industry from bioterrorism, plant and animal diseases, and agricultural pests; assist as directed by the Governor in the Commonwealth’s response to natural disasters; develop and implement programs and inspection activities to ensure that the Commonwealth’s agricultural products move freely in trade domestically and internationally; and enter into agreements with federal, state, and local governments, land grant universities, and other organizations that include marketing, plant protection, pest control, pesticides, and meat and poultry inspection.

In addition, the Commissioner shall:

Establish and maintain a farm-to-school website. The purpose of the website shall be to facilitate and promote the purchase of Virginia farm products by schools, universities, and other educational institutions under the jurisdiction of the State Department of Education. The website shall present such current information as the availability of Virginia farm products, including the types and amount of products, and the names of and contact information for farmers, farm organizations, and businesses marketing such products;

Establish and operate a nonprofit, nonstock corporation under Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 as a public instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions to promote, develop, and sustain markets for licensed Virginia wineries and farm wineries, as defined in §

4.1-100

. Such corporation shall provide wholesale wine distribution services for wineries and farm wineries licensed in accordance with §

4.1-206.1

. The board of directors of such corporation shall be composed of the Commissioner and four members appointed by the Board, including one owner or manager of a winery or farm winery licensee that is not served by a wholesaler when the owner or manager is appointed to the board; one owner or manager of a winery or farm winery licensee that produces no more than 10,000 cases per year; and two owners or managers of wine wholesaler licensees. In making appointments to the board of directors, the Board shall consider nominations of winery and farm winery licensees submitted by the Virginia Wineries Association and wine wholesale licensees submitted by the Virginia Wine Wholesalers Association. The Commissioner shall require such corporation to report to him at least annually on its activities, including reporting the quantity of wine distributed for each winery and farm winery during the preceding year. The provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act shall not apply to the establishment of such corporation nor to the exercise of any of its powers granted under this section; and

Promulgate regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) not inconsistent with the laws of Virginia necessary to carry out the provisions of Article 1.1:1 (§

18.2-340.15

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 18.2. Such regulations may include penalties for violations.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-7, 3-9, 3-13; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-8, 3.1-10, 3.1-14; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 34; 1975, c. 260; 1977, c. 186; 1978, cc. 219, 540; 1982, c. 150; 1985, c. 397; 1993, c. 455; 1994, cc. 261, 370; 1995, c. 10; 1996, c. 996; 2005, c. 633; 2007, cc. 352, 870, 932, §§ 3.1-14.4, 3.1-14.01; 2008, c. 860; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2022, cc. 554, 609.

Cross references.

As to restricted wholesale wine licenses, see §

4.1-207.1

.

As to conditions under which Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of Directors shall refuse to grant licenses, see §

4.1-223

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 870 and 932, in cl. 3 provide: “That the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall implement the provisions of this act consistent with an opinion of the Attorney General dated April 18, 2006, within 90 days of the effective date of this act [April 4, 2007].”

Effective July 1, 2018, Acts 2007, cc. 870 and 932, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 2, provides: “That the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall assist the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services in the formation and operation of the nonprofit, nonstock corporation established pursuant to § 3.1-14.01 of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl.
16 provides: “That the Governor may transfer an appropriation or any portion thereof within a state agency established, abolished, or otherwise affected by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, or from one such agency to another, to support the changes in organization or responsibility resulting from or required by the provisions of the 13th enactment of this act, provided that any such transfer shall be limited to salary and fringe benefits for any personnel transferred and reasonable administrative overhead and costs.”

Acts 2020, c. 571, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services (the Department) shall investigate and enter into negotiations for the involvement of the Commonwealth in the whole or partial operation or management of the Virginia Horse Center Foundation (the Foundation), including the addition of state-appointed members to the Board of Directors of the Foundation. In investigating, the Department may take any steps necessary to accomplish the investigation, including negotiations with the Board of Directors, but shall not expend state funds for the purchase, transfer, or lease of real property unless specifically appropriated for that purpose or approved by the General Assembly.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in §

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1113 and 1114, cl. 7 provides: “That any farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery that, prior to July 1, 2016, (i) holds a valid license granted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board) in accordance with Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and (ii) is in compliance with the local zoning ordinance as an agricultural district or classification or as otherwise permitted by a locality for farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery use shall be allowed to continue such use as provided in §

15.2-2307

of the Code of Virginia, notwithstanding (a) the provisions of §

4.1-206.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (b) a subsequent change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016, whether by transfer, acquisition, inheritance, or other means. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may expand any existing building or structure and the uses thereof so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. Any such farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery located on land zoned residential conservation prior to July 1, 2016, may construct a new building or structure so long as specifically approved by the locality by special exception. All such licensees shall comply with the requirements of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia and Board regulations for renewal of such license or the issuance of a new license in the event of a change in ownership of the farm winery, limited brewery, or limited distillery on or after July 1, 2016.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 13, are identical, and deleted former subdivisions B 1, B 2, and B 3, and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 106, effective January 1, 2013, are identical, and purported to delete subdivision B 1 and make an internal reference change in subdivision B 3. Both subdivisions B 1 and B 3 were deleted by cl. 13 of cc. 803 and 835, effective July 1, 2012.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114, effective January 1, 2022, are identical, and in subdivision B 2, substituted “§

4.1-206.1

” for “§

4.1-207

” in the second sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 554 and 609 are identical, and added subdivision B 3 and made stylistic changes.

§ 3.2-103.
Records to be held in confidence.

The Commissioner shall hold the following records of the Department in confidence unless otherwise directed by the Governor or the Board:

Schedules of work for regulatory inspection;

Trade secrets and commercial or financial information supplied by individuals or business entities to the Department;

Reports of criminal violations made to the Department by persons outside the Department;

Records of active investigations until the investigations are closed;

Financial records of applicants for assistance from the Virginia Farm Loan Revolving Account except those records that are otherwise a matter of public record; and

Tax returns required by the agricultural commodity boards established pursuant to this title to the extent necessary to protect the privacy of individual taxpayers.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-13; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-14; 1975, c. 260; 1977, c. 186; 1978, cc. 219, 540; 1982, c. 150; 1993, c. 455; 1994, cc. 261, 370; 1995, c. 10; 1996, c. 996; 2005, c. 633; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-104.
Commissioner may serve on board of national tobacco trust entity.

The Commissioner may serve in his official capacity on the board of directors of any entity established to ensure the implementation in the Commonwealth of a national tobacco trust established to provide payments to tobacco growers and tobacco quota owners to ameliorate adverse economic consequences resulting from a national settlement of states’ claims against tobacco manufacturers.

History.

2000, c. 1048, § 3.1-14.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-105.
Century farm program.

The Commissioner shall establish a century farm program to honor farm families in the Commonwealth whose property has been in the same family for 100 years or more. In order to be eligible for recognition under the program, a farm shall (i) have been owned by the same family for at least 100 consecutive years; (ii) be lived on, or actually farmed, by a descendant of the original owners; and (iii) gross more than $2,500 annually from the sale of farm products.

History.

1997, c. 161, § 3.1-17.1; 1999, c. 346; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 6.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 6, substituted “descendant” for “descendent” in the last sentence and deleted the former last sentence, which read “At the discretion of the Commissioner, a farm that does not gross more than $2,500 annually but is being used for a bona fide silvicultural purpose may be recognized under the program.”

§ 3.2-106.
Horse breeder incentive program.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth to encourage the growth of all segments of its agricultural industry. The General Assembly finds that the horse breeding industry has a significant impact on the Commonwealth’s economy and that it is to the Commonwealth’s benefit to encourage, expand, and develop horse breeding farms with programs providing financial incentives to breeders that will encourage and supplement private capital.

To the extent that public or private funds become available, the Department may establish a program of financial incentives designed to encourage, expand, and develop the breeding of horses in the Commonwealth. The Department shall adopt appropriate regulations for the administration of the program. Such regulations shall provide for the distribution of financial awards to breeders only to the extent that public funds made available to the Department for the program are matched dollar for dollar by private funds. The regulations shall also provide that no single breeder shall receive, in any one calendar year, more than 10 percent of the public funds made available to the Department for the program during that year. Awards made under any such incentive program shall be limited to horses foaled in the Commonwealth that are owned by breeders who are actively engaged in the breeding of horses in the Commonwealth.

History.

1981, c. 140, § 3.1-741.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-107.
Testing samples of products delivered to laboratories; prescribing and collecting fees; Laboratory Fee Fund established; disposition of moneys.

The Commissioner may have tested samples of manufactured, processed, or natural products delivered to laboratories operated by the Division of Consolidated Laboratory Services or the Department and prescribe and collect reasonable fees for the services rendered.

All fees and moneys collected or received by the Commissioner or the Department in its official capacity for the testing of samples of manufactured, processed, or natural products shall be paid into the Laboratory Fee Fund.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Laboratory Fee Fund, hereinafter referred to as the Fund. The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of the costs of the testing provided for in this section. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-13.1, 3-13.2; 1964, c. 163; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-15, 3.1-16; 1972, c. 741; 1978, cc. 219, 702; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-108.
Department to establish a program to support new and emerging crops and technologies.

From such funds as may be appropriated for such purposes and from gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds as may be received, the Department shall establish a program to:

Encourage the production of alternative crops in the Commonwealth that may be used as a feedstock for energy generation and transportation, thereby supporting farmers and farm communities in their efforts to: (i) sustain and enhance economically viable business opportunities in agriculture; (ii) reduce nonpoint source pollution in the Chesapeake Bay and other waters of the Commonwealth; (iii) restore depleted soils; (iv) provide wildlife habitat; (v) reduce greenhouse gases; and (vi) reduce the country’s dependence on foreign supplies of energy;

Assist the development of bioenergy feedstock crop technologies, including but not limited to, seed stock supplies, production technology, harvest equipment, transportation infrastructure and storage facilities;

Identify and assist in the development of commercially viable bioenergy market opportunities, including recruitment, expansion and establishment of renewable bioenergy businesses in Virginia; and

Promote the aquaculture of the species that are natives to or reside within the waters of the Chesapeake Bay and the Virginia Coast, in concert with the efforts of Virginia higher education institutions and the Virginia Marine Resources Commission, with a focus on assisting “traditional watermen” who rely on harvesting marine fish and shellfish. This effort shall also include watermen who are viable working participants of the aquaculture industry as contract growers, cooperatives or other business entities.

The Department shall provide funds in the form of grants to accomplish the objectives described in subsection A. The Department shall develop guidelines for the operation of the program that shall include, at a minimum, eligibility criteria for receiving grant awards, financial accountability for receiving grant awards, allowable uses of grant funds, and agricultural programmatic priorities. The Department shall consult with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the U.S. Department of Agriculture’s Natural Resources Conservation Service, when appropriate, to ensure compatibility with existing cost-share and other agricultural incentive programs.

History.

2007, c. 806, § 3.1-14.5; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-108.1.
Virginia Pollinator Protection Strategy.

The Department shall develop and maintain a Virginia Pollinator Protection Strategy (the Strategy) to (i) promote the health of and mitigate the risks to all pollinator species and (ii) ensure a robust agriculture economy and apiary industry for honeybees and other managed pollinators.

In developing the Strategy, the Department shall seek the assistance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, the Department of Wildlife Resources, and the Department of Environmental Quality and shall establish a stakeholder group composed of representatives of affected groups, including beekeepers, agricultural producers, commercial pesticide applicators, private pesticide applicators, pesticide manufacturers, retailers, lawn and turf service providers, agribusiness and farmer organizations, conservation interests, Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, Virginia State University, and the Virginia Cooperative Extension.

The Strategy shall include a plan for the protection of managed pollinators that provides voluntary best management practices for pesticide users, beekeepers, and landowners and agricultural producers. The protection plan shall support:

Communication between beekeepers and applicators;

Reduction of the risk to pollinators from pesticides;

Increases in pollinator habitat;

Maintenance of existing compliance with state pesticide use requirements;

Identification of needs for further research to promote robust agriculture and apiary industries; and

Identification of additional opportunities for education and outreach on pollinators.

History.

2016, c. 11; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 11, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall, no later than July 1, 2017, provide an interim report on the Virginia Pollinator Protection Strategy (the Strategy) to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources, the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources, and the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services (the Board) and shall, upon completion of the Strategy but not later than July 1, 2018, report on the Strategy to those committees and the Board.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 458, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services (the Department) shall study the Beekeeper Pollinator Protection Plan and voluntary best management practices, authorized pursuant to §

3.2-108.1

of the Code of Virginia, for the purpose of proposing improvements to communication between beekeepers and applicators to further reduce the risk to pollinators from neonicotinoid pesticides. In conducting its study, the Department may establish a stakeholder working group composed of representatives of affected groups, including beekeepers, agricultural producers, commercial pesticide applicators, private pesticide applicators, pesticide manufacturers, retailers, lawn and turf service providers, the Virginia Farm Bureau, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, other agribusiness and farmer organizations, and the Virginia Cooperative Extension. The Department shall, no later than December 1, 2021, provide a report on its findings to the Chairman of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the Chairman of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection B.

§ 3.2-108.2.
Expansion of the Commonwealth’s slaughter and meat-processing facilities.

It is the policy of the Commonwealth to encourage the growth of all segments of its agricultural industry. The General Assembly finds that the livestock industry has a significant impact on the Commonwealth’s economy and that it is to the Commonwealth’s benefit to encourage, expand, and develop slaughter and meat-processing facilities with strategic planning and programs that provide financial incentives and technical assistance to encourage and supplement private capital. The General Assembly finds that it is to the Commonwealth’s benefit to maintain a state meat inspection program in cooperation with the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

The Department shall establish a strategic plan to increase the combined throughput capacity of inspected slaughter and meat-processing facilities in the Commonwealth and provide recommendations to the General Assembly as to how to implement the strategic plan.

To the extent that public or private funds become available, the Department may establish a program of financial incentives and technical assistance designed to encourage, expand, and develop slaughter and meat-processing facilities in the Commonwealth.

History.

2022, cc. 311, 310.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, cc. 310 and
311, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall develop a five-year strategic plan to achieve an increase in the total combined throughput capacity of inspected slaughter and meat-processing facilities. The strategic plan shall be completed by January 1, 2023.”